Florida, session 2026, SB1678.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsection (14) is added to section 561.20, 20 Florida Statutes, to read: 21 561.20âLimitation upon number of licenses issued.â 22 (14)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âTHC-infused 23 beverageâ means any beverage intended for human consumption 24 which contains any intoxicating hemp-derived cannabinoid, 25 including, but not limited to, Delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, 26 Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, Delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, 27 hexahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinol-O, or 28 tetrahydrocannabinol-P, in any amount, regardless of whether 29 such beverage also contains alcohol. 30 (b)âNotwithstanding s. 581.217 or any other law, a THC 31 infused beverage may be sold, offered for sale, or distributed 32 at retail in this state only by the holder of an active 33 alcoholic beverage license issued pursuant to subsection (1) or 34 subparagraph (2)(a)4. 35 (c)âAny person or entity that does not hold an active 36 alcoholic beverage license issued pursuant to subsection (1) or 37 subparagraph (2)(a)4. is prohibited from selling, offering for 38 sale, possessing for sale, or distributing THC-infused beverages 39 in this state. 40 (d)âA violation of this subsection constitutes an 41 unlicensed activity under the Beverage Law and is punishable in 42 the same manner as the unlicensed sale or service of alcoholic 43 beverages, including penalties provided in this chapter and 44 chapters 562 and 565. 45 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.